Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2704
Authority to require demonstration of exemption.

The director may require that any person claiming to be exempt from licensing under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act pursuant to section 8-2703 provide information and documentation to the director demonstrating that such person qualifies for exemption.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 9.